Wisconsin, session 2025, AB420.
do enact as follows:AB420,13Section 1. 118.19 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB420,2,224118.19 (3) (a) No license to teach in any public school may be issued unless the 5applicant possesses a bachelor’s degree including such professional training as the 6department by rule requires, except as permitted under par. (b) and ss. 115.28 (17) 1(a), 118.191, 118.1915, 118.192, 118.193, 118.194, and 118.197. Notwithstanding s. 236.11 (16), no teacher preparatory program in this state may be approved by the 3state superintendent under s. 115.28 (7) (a), unless each student in the program is 4required to complete student teaching consisting of full days for a full semester or 5summer session following the daily schedule and semester or summer session 6calendar of the cooperating school or the equivalent, as determined by the state 7superintendent. No license to teach in any public school may be granted to an 8applicant who completed a professional training program outside this state unless 9the applicant completed student teaching consisting of full days for a full semester 10or summer session following the daily schedule and semester or summer session 11calendar of the cooperating school or the equivalent, as determined by the state 12superintendent. The state superintendent may grant exceptions to the student 13teaching requirements under this paragraph when the midyear calendars of the 14institution offering the teacher preparatory program and the cooperating school 15differ from each other and would prevent students from attending classes at the 16institution in accordance with the institution’s calendar. The state superintendent 17shall promulgate rules to implement this subsection. If for the purpose of granting 18a license to teach or for approving a teacher preparatory program the state 19superintendent requires that an institution of higher education be accredited, the 20state superintendent shall accept accreditation by a regional or national 21institutional accrediting agency recognized by the U.S. department of education or 22by a programmatic accrediting organization.AB420,2,2323